Arkansas, session 2025, SB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "End Organ and Genomic
Harvesting Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-106. Prohibition on certain genetic sequencers and genetic
analysis technologies — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Foreign adversary" means the same as the definition of
prohibited foreign party under § 18-11-802;
*JMB128*
04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB311
(2) "Genetic sequencer" means a device or platform used to
conduct genetic analysis, resequencing, isolation, or other genetic research;
(3) "Human genome" means deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) or
ribonucleic acid (RNA) found in human cells;
(4) "Medical facility" means a facility for the delivery of
healthcare services that:
(A) Either:
(i) Receives state moneys, including interagency
pass-through appropriations from the United States Government; or
(ii) Is licensed, registered, or permitted in this
state to provide healthcare services; and
(B) Conducts research or testing on, with, or relating to
genetic analysis or the human genome;
(5) "Operational and research software" means computer programs
used for the operation, control, analysis, or other necessary functions of
genetic analysis or genetic sequencers; and
(6) "Research facility" means a facility that:
(A) Receives state moneys, including interagency pass-
through appropriations from the United States Government; and
(B) Conducts research on, with, or relating to genetic
analysis or the human genome.
(b) Beginning on October 1, 2025, a medical facility or research
facility in this state shall not put into service within this state any new
or additional genetic sequencers or operational and research software used
for genetic analysis produced by a foreign adversary, a state-owned
enterprise of a foreign adversary, a company domiciled within a foreign
adversary, or a company-owned or company-controlled subsidiary of a company
domiciled within a foreign adversary for the purpose of conducting genetic
analysis.
(c) A medical facility or research facility in this state shall report
in writing to the Secretary of the Department of Health on all instances of
ongoing usage of genetic sequencers and operational and research software
used for genetic sequencers produced by a foreign adversary, a state-owned
enterprise of a foreign adversary, a company domiciled within a foreign
adversary, or a company-owned or company-controlled subsidiary of a company
domiciled within a foreign adversary on January 1 of each year until the
04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB311
equipment is no longer in use.
(d)(1) A medical facility, research facility, or other company or
entity shall store all genetic sequencing data outside of foreign adversary
countries.
(2) Remote access to data storage, other than open data, from
foreign adversary countries is prohibited.
(3) If a medical facility, research facility, or other company
or entity stores genetic sequencing data, including through contracts with a
third-party data storage company, the medical facility, research facility, or
other company or entity shall ensure the security of genetic sequencing data
using reasonable encryption methods, restrictions on access, and other
cybersecurity best practices.
(e) On or before December 31 of each year, a medical facility or
research facility shall certify in writing to the Attorney General and the
Department of Health that the medical facility or research facility is
complying with this section.
(f)(1) A person or entity determined to be in violation of this
section or found guilty of a violation of this section shall be subject to a
fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.
(2) Each unique instance of an individual’s genome having
undergone genetic sequencing or analysis using prohibited genetic sequencers
or prohibited operational and research software shall be considered a
separate violation.
(g)(1) Any person may notify the Attorney General of a violation or
potential violation of this section.
(2) If the person notifying the Attorney General is an employee
of the entity accused of a violation, the person shall be afforded all
protections of a whistleblower under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, § 21-1-
601 et seq.
(3) If the person notifying the Attorney General is a patient or
research subject of an entity found guilty of a violation of this section and
the person's genetic information was used in violation of this section, the
entity shall also be found to have violated the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
(4) The Attorney General may investigate allegations of
violations of this section.
04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB311

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-79-169. Insurance coverage of certain human organ transplant or
post-transplant care prohibited — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Forced organ harvesting" means the removal of one (1) or
more organs from a living person, or from a person killed for the purpose of
removal of one (1) or more organs, by means of coercion, abduction,
deception, fraud, or abuse of power over a position of vulnerability;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, policy,
or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or extended in this
state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance organization, hospital
medical service corporation, or self-insured governmental or church plan in
this state; and
(ii) Any health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes without limitation
indemnity and managed care plans.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB311
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) Plans providing health benefits to state and
public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.; and
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means any insurance company,
hospital and medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization
that issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state and is subject to
any of the following laws:
(i) The insurance laws of this state;
(ii) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(iii) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits.
(b) Regardless of a claim filed by a medical facility or provider, a
health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed in this state shall
not provide coverage for a human organ transplant or post-transplant care if:
(1) The transplant operation is performed in the People's
Republic of China or another country known to have participated in forced
organ harvesting, as designated by rule by the Insurance Commissioner; or
(2) The human organ to be transplanted is procured by sale or
donation originating in the People's Republic of China or another country
known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by rule
by the commissioner.
(c)(1) The commissioner may designate by rule any additional country
as having participated in forced organ harvesting if the government of that
country funds, sponsors, or otherwise facilitates forced organ harvesting.
(2) If under subdivision (c)(1) of this section the commissioner
designates an additional country as having participated in forced organ
harvesting, the commissioner shall provide written notice to healthcare
insurers.
(d) A healthcare insurer may seek reimbursement or setoff from a
medical facility or provider if a claim is submitted and paid in violation of
this section.
04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB311
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, care that is
provided to save the life of an individual after the individual receives a
prohibited organ transplant shall be covered.
(f) The commissioner shall develop and promulgate rules for the
implementation and administration of this section.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

/s/C. Penzo






















04-07-2025 15:05:47 JMB128